en: onion powder, granulated onion, dried minced onion, onion powders
bg: лук на прах
ca: ceba en pols
cs: sušená cibule
da: løgpulver
de: Zwiebelpulver
el: κρεμμύδια σε σκόνη, κρεμμύδι σκόνη
eo: pulvorigita cepo
es: cebolla en polvo, Cebolla seca molida, Cebollas secas en polvo
et: sibulapulber
fi: sipulijauhe
fr: oignon en poudre, oignons en poudre, poudre d'oignons, poudre d'oignon, granulés d'oignon, oignon granulé
he: אבקת בצל, בצל מיובש כתוש, בצל כתוש מיובש
hr: luk u prahu
hu: vöröshagymapor
it: cipolla en polvere
ja: 玉ねぎパウダー
lt: svogūnų milteliai
lv: sīpolu pulveris
ms: serbuk bawang
nb: løkpulver
nl: uienpoeder, uipoeder, Uienpoeders
pl: cebula w proszku
pt: cebola em pó
ro: ceapă pudră
ru: Луковый порошок
sk: sušená cibuľa
sl: čebula v prahu
sv: lökpulver
tr: soğan tozu

en: pearl onion, pearl onions
bg: перлени лукчета
de: perlzwiebel
fi: pikkusipuli, pikkusipulit
fr: oignons grelots, grelot
hr: biserni luk
is: perlulaukur
it: cipolla perlata
pl: cebula perłowa, cebulka perłowa

en: Onion Extract
de: Zwiebelextrakt
es: Extracto de cebolla
et: sibulaekstrakt
fi: sipuliuute
fr: extrait d'oignon
hr: ekstrakt luka
it: Estratto di cipolla
ja: 玉ねぎエキス, オニオンエキス
lt: svogūnų ekstraktas
nl: uienextract
pl: ekstrakt z cebuli, ekstrakty z cebuli, ekstrakt cebulowy
pt: extrato de cebolo, extracto de cebolo
sv: lökextrakt

en: fried onion
bg: пържен лук
cs: smažená cibule
de: röstzwiebeln
it: cipolla fritta
ro: ceapă prajită

en: pre fried onions
da: forstegte løg
de: vorgebratene Zwiebeln
es: cebollas pre freidas
fi: esipaistettu sipuli, esipaistetut sipulit
fr: oignons préfrits, oignon préfrit
hr: prethodno prženi luk
it: cipolle prefritte
nl: voorgefrituurde uitjes
nn: friterad lök
pt: cebolas pre fritas
ru: лук жареный
sv: forhåndsstekt løk

fr: oignon préfrit à l'huile de tournesol
it: cipolla prefritta in olio di girasole
nl: voorgebakken ui in zonnebloemolie
sv: lök brynt i solrosolja

en: shallot, shallots
am: ቀይ ሽንኩርት
ar: كراث أندلسي
br: chalotez
ca: escalunya
cs: cibule šalotka
da: skalotteløg
de: Schalotte, Schalotten
eo: askalono
es: chalota
eu: tipulatx
fa: موسیر
fi: salottisipuli
fr: échalote
gl: chalota
he: בצלצל
hr: ljutika
ht: echalot
hu: mogyoróhagyma
id: kunir
io: shaloto
is: skalottlaukur
it: scalogno
ja: エシャロット
jv: brambang
ko: 셜롯
la: allium ascalonicum
lb: schalott
ml: ചുവന്നുള്ളി
ms: bawang merah
my: ကြက်သွန်နီကလေး
nb: sjalottløk
ne: छ्यापी
nl: sjalot, sjalotten
nn: Sjalottlauk
oc: Escaluènha
pl: szalotka, czosnek askaloński, szalotki
pt: chalota
ro: hașmă
ru: Лук-шалот
su: bawang beureum
sv: schalottenlök
ta: சின்ன வெங்காயம்
th: หอมแดง
tr: arpacık soğanı
uk: Цибуля шалот
ur: قفلوط
vi: Hẹ tây
zh: 火葱

en: red shallot
fr: échalote rouge
hr: crvena ljutika
it: scalogno rosso
pl: czerwona szalotka

en: concentrated shallot juice
de: Konzentrierter Zwiebelsaft
fr: jus d'échalote concentré
hr: koncentrirani sok od ljutike
it: succo concentrato di scalogno

en: leek
ar: كراث
az: kəvər soğanı
be: цыбуля парэй
bg: праз, праз лук
bn: পলাণ্ডু
bo: ཀེའུ་ཙོང་།
br: pour
ca: porro
co: porru
cs: pór, pórek
cy: cenhinen
da: porre, porrer
de: Lauch, Lauche, Porrees, Porree
el: πράσο
eo: poreo
es: puerro, puerros
eu: porru
fa: تره‌فرنگی
fi: purjo, purjosipuli
fr: poireau, poireaux
ga: cainneann
gl: allo porro
gv: cannian
ha: albasa mai kara
he: כרישה
hi: हरा प्याज
hr: poriluk
ht: powo
hu: póréhagyma
hy: պրաս
id: bawang prei
io: porelo
is: blaðlaukur
it: porro, porri
ja: リーキ
jv: brambang préi
ka: პრასი
kk: порей пиязы, poreý pïyazı, پورەي پىييازى
kn: ಲೀಕ್
ko: 대파
ku: pirasa, پراسا
la: allium ampeloprasum var. porrum
li: sjpoor
lt: poras, daržinis poras
lv: puravi
mk: праз
ms: bawang perai, ‏باوڠ ڤراي‎‎
mt: kurrat
my: ထန်းကြက်သွန်
nb: purre, purreløk
nl: prei
nn: purre
oc: pòrre
os: зæнгджын хъæдындз
pl: por, pora
pt: alho-porro, alho francês
ro: praz
ru: лук-порей
rw: igitunguru
sc: porru
se: boskalávki
sh: praziluk
sk: pór
sl: por
sq: presh, preshi
sr: празилук, praziluk
sv: purjolök
ta: லீக்ஸ்
tg: гандано
th: กระเทียมต้น
tr: pırasa
uk: цибуля порей
ur: کراث
vi: tỏi tây
wa: porea
yi: פארע-ציבעלע
zh: 韭葱

en: concentrated leek juice
da: koncentreret porresaft
de: Konzentrierter Porreesaft
fr: jus de poireau concentré
hr: koncentriranog soka od poriluka
it: succo concentrato di porro

en: leek sprouts
it: germogli di porro
pl: kiełki pora

en: garlic
af: Knoffel
am: ነጭ ሽንኩርት
ar: ثوم
ay: Ajusa
az: Sarımsaq
ba: һарымһаҡ
be: часнок
bg: чесън
bi: Galik
bm: tumɛ
bn: রসুন
bo: སྒོག་ལོག
br: Kignen
bs: Bijeli luk
ca: all, allets, dent d'all, dents d'alls
co: Aglia
cs: česnek, česnek kuchyňský
cv: Ыхра
cy: Garlleg
da: hvidløg, hvidløgs
de: Knoblauch
dv: ލޮނުމެދު
el: σκόρδο
eo: ajlo
es: ajo, diente de ajo, dientes de ajo
et: küüslauk, küüslaugu
eu: baratxuri
fa: سیر
fi: valkosipuli, valkosipulia
fo: hvítleykur
fr: ail
fy: knyflok
ga: Gairleog
gd: creamh
gl: Allo
gn: Áho
gu: લસણ
gv: Garleid
ha: Tafarnuwa
he: שום
hi: लहसुन
hr: češnjak
ht: Lay
hu: fokhagyma
hy: Սխտոր
id: Bawang putih
io: Alio
is: Hvítlaukur
it: aglio
ja: ニンニク, にんにく, ガーリック
jv: Bawang
ka: ნიორი
kk: Сарымсақ
km: ខ្ទឹមស
kn: ಬೆಳ್ಳುಳ್ಳಿ
ko: 마늘
ku: sîr
ky: Сарымсак
la: Allium sativum
lb: Knuewelek
lg: Emisuwa egikaluba
li: witlouk
lo: ຜັກທຽມ
lt: Valgomasis česnakas, česnakai
lv: ķiploks, ķiploki
mk: Лук
ml: വെളുത്തുള്ളി
mn: Саримс
mr: लसूण
ms: bawang putih
mt: tewm
my: ကြက်သွန်ဖြူ
nb: hvitløk
ne: लसुन
nl: knoflook
nn: hvitløk, hvitløks
nv: Tłʼohchin díchʼííʼí
oc: Alh cultivat
or: ରସୁଣ
os: Нуры
pa: ਲਸਣ
pl: czosnek, czosnku, czosnkowy, czosnkowa, czosnkowe
ps: هوږه
pt: alho
qu: Ahus
ro: usturoi
ru: чеснок, чеснок свежий
sa: लशुनम्
sc: Azu
sd: ٿوم
sh: Češnjak
si: සුදු ලූනු
sk: Cesnak kuchynský
sl: Česen
so: Toon
sq: hudhra
sr: бели лук, beli luk
sv: vitlök, vitlöks
sw: Kitunguu saumu
ta: பூண்டு
te: వెల్లులి
tg: Сирпиёз
th: กระเทียม
tl: Bawang
tm: sarymsak
tr: Sarımsak
tt: сарымсак
uk: часник
ur: لہسن
uz: Sarimsoq
vi: Tỏi
vo: läl
wa: A
wo: laac
yi: קנאבל
za: suenq
zh: 蒜

en: garlic clove
fr: gousse d'ail

en: garlic bulb, head of garlic
fr: tête d'ail, bulbe d'ail

en: tender garlic
da: hvidløgsskud
de: Knoblauchsprossen, Knoblauch-Sprossen
es: ajo tierno, ajete
hr: nježni češnjak
it: aglio tenero

en: garlic puree
bg: чесново пюре
da: hvidløgspuré, hvidløgspure
de: Knoblauchpüree
es: puré de ajo
fi: valkosipulipyree, valkosipulisose
fr: purée d'ail
hr: pire od češnjaka
hu: fokhagymapüré
it: Purè d'aglio
nl: knoflookpuree
pl: przecier z czosnku, przecier czosnkowy
sv: vitlökspuré

en: garlic paste
bg: чеснова паста
de: Knoblauchpaste
es: Pasta de ajo
fi: valkosipulitahna
fr: pâte d'ail, pulpe d'ail, ail en purée
hr: pasta od češnjaka
it: Impasto d'aglio
pl: pasta czosnkowa

en: garlic powder, garlic powders
bs: bijeli luk u prahu
ca: all en pols
cs: česnekový prášek
da: hvidløgspulver
de: Knoblauchpulver
el: σκόρδο σκόνη, σκόρδο σε σκόνη
es: ajo en polvo
et: küüslaugupulber
fi: valkosipulijauhe
fr: poudre d'ail, ail en poudre
hu: fokhagymapor
it: aglio in polvere, polvere di aglio
lt: česnakų milteliai, česnako milteliai
nl: knoflookpoeder
nn: hvitløkspulver
pl: czosnek sproszkowany
pt: alho em pó
ro: pudră de usturoi
ru: Чесночный порошок
sl: česen v prahu
sv: vitlökspulver
tr: sarimsak tozu

en: black garlic
bg: черен чесън
de: schwarzer Knoblauch
es: ajo negro
fr: Ail noir
hr: crni češnjak
it: aglio nero
nl: zwarte knoflook
pl: Czarny czosnek